Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 1. The Department and the Commissioner.

§ 37.2-300.
Creation and supervision of Department.

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services is hereby established in the executive branch of government responsible to the Governor. The Department shall be under the supervision and management of the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall carry out his management and supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the policies and regulations of the Board and applicable federal and state statutes and regulations.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 14-22, 37-53; 1950, p. 902; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-16; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-39; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1998, c. 872; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 685 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall convene a work group to include representatives of the Office of the Attorney General, community services boards, local and regional jails, and such other stakeholders as it deems necessary to study the issue of and develop a plan for sharing of protected health information of individuals with mental health treatment needs who have been confined to a local or regional jail in the Commonwealth and who have previously received mental health treatment from a community services board or behavioral health authority in the Commonwealth. Such plan shall include a mechanism for (i) determining if an individual confined in a local or regional jail has previously received treatment from a community services board or behavioral health authority in the Commonwealth and (ii) in cases in which such person has received such treatment, transferring protected health information related to such treatment from the identified community services board to the sheriff or superintendent of the local or regional jail in which the person is confined. The Department shall report by October 1, 2019, to the Governor and the General Assembly on (a) development of the plan, (b) the content of the plan, and (c) the steps necessary to implement the plan, including any statutory or regulatory changes and any appropriations.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardaton and Substance Abuse Services” at the beginning of the first sentence.

§ 37.2-301.
Appointment of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, if in session when the appointment is made or, if not in session, at its next session.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-54; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-40; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-302.
Term of office and vacancy therein.

The Commissioner shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with that of the Governor making the appointment or until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments are made.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-55; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-41; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-303.
Qualifications of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall be a person of proven executive and administrative ability and shall have had appropriate education and substantial experience in the fields of mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-56; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-42; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services” for “mental health, mental retardation, or substance abuse.”

§ 37.2-304.
Duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall be the chief executive officer of the Department and shall have the following duties and powers:

To supervise and manage the Department and its state facilities.

To employ the personnel required to carry out the purposes of this title.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of the Department’s duties and the execution of its powers under this title, including contracts with the United States, other states, and agencies and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth, consistent with policies and regulations of the Board and applicable federal and state statutes and regulations.

To accept, hold, and enjoy gifts, donations, and bequests on behalf of the Department from the United States government, agencies and instrumentalities thereof, and any other source, subject to the approval of the Governor. To these ends, the Commissioner shall have the power to comply with conditions and execute agreements that may be necessary, convenient, or desirable, consistent with policies and regulations of the Board.

To accept, execute, and administer any trust in which the Department may have an interest, under the terms of the instruments creating the trust, subject to the approval of the Governor.

To transfer between state hospitals and training centers school-age individuals who have been identified as appropriate to be placed in public school programs and to negotiate with other school divisions for placements in order to ameliorate the impact on those school divisions located in a jurisdiction in which a state hospital or training center is located.

To provide to the Director of the Commonwealth’s designated protection and advocacy system, established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

, a written report setting forth the known facts of (i) critical incidents, as that term is defined in §

37.2-709.1

, or deaths of individuals receiving services in facilities, within 15 working days of such critical incident or death; (ii) serious incidents and deaths that are required to be reported to the Department through its incident reporting system, as required by regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

37.2-400

et seq.), within 15 working days of the date the report is received; and (iii) allegations of abuse or neglect that are required to be reported pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

37.2-400

et seq.), within five working days of the date on which the director’s final decision on the allegation is reported to the Department.

To work with the appropriate state and federal entities to ensure that any individual who has received services in a state facility for more than one year has possession of or receives prior to discharge any of the following documents, when they are needed to obtain the services contained in his discharge plan: a Department of Motor Vehicles approved identification card that will expire 90 days from issuance, a copy of his birth certificate if the individual was born in the Commonwealth, or a social security card from the Social Security Administration. State facility directors, as part of their responsibilities pursuant to §

37.2-837

, shall implement this provision when discharging individuals.

To work with the Department of Veterans Services and the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services to establish a program for mental health and rehabilitative services for Virginia veterans and members of the Virginia National Guard and Virginia residents in the Armed Forces Reserves not in active federal service and their family members pursuant to §

2.2-2001.1

.

To establish and maintain a pharmaceutical and therapeutics committee composed of representatives of the Department of Medical Assistance Services, state facilities operated by the Department, community services boards, at least one health insurance plan, and at least one individual receiving services to develop a drug formulary for use at all community services boards, state facilities operated by the Department, and providers licensed by the Department.

To establish and maintain the Commonwealth Mental Health First Aid Program pursuant to §

37.2-312.2

.

To submit a report for the preceding fiscal year by December 1 of each year to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations that provides information on the operation of Virginia’s publicly funded behavioral health and developmental services system. The report shall include a brief narrative and data on the number of individuals receiving state facility services or community services board services, including purchased inpatient psychiatric services; the types and amounts of services received by these individuals; and state facility and community services board service capacities, staffing, revenues, and expenditures. The annual report shall describe major new initiatives implemented during the past year and shall provide information on the accomplishment of systemic outcome and performance measures during the year.

To establish a comprehensive program for the prevention and treatment of problem gambling in the Commonwealth and administer the Problem Gambling Treatment and Support Fund established pursuant to §

37.2-314.2

.Unless specifically authorized by the Governor to accept or undertake activities for compensation, the Commissioner shall devote his entire time to his duties.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-42.1; 1980, c. 582; 1985, c. 158; 2000, cc. 565, 610; 2002, c. 572; 2003, c. 516; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 584, 754; 2011, c. 473; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 803, 835, 847; 2013, c. 571; 2016, cc. 94, 407, 686; 2017, cc. 418, 426, 455, 470; 2020, cc. 1197, 1218, 1248, 1256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 64, 65.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 473, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall establish the pharmaceutical and therapeutics committee pursuant to subdivision 10 of §

37.2-304

of the Code of Virginia no later than July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

2.2-510

,

37.2-304

, and

37.2-709

of the Code of Virginia shall be effective on January 1, 2014.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 4 provides: “That the Director of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy shall, together with the Secretary of Health and Human Resources or his designee, develop a plan for implementation of the provisions of this act and shall report on such plan to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 5 provides: “That any regulations adopted by the Board for Protection and Advocacy being abolished by the first enactment of this act that are in effect before January 1, 2014, are hereby repealed as of that date. The Registrar of Regulations shall take appropriate administrative action to effect the repeal of the regulations in the Virginia Administrative Code.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

2.2-2905

,

2.2-3705.3

,

37.2-304

, and

37.2-709

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective January 1, 2014.”

Acts 2017, cc. 94 and 97 provide: “§ 1. The Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Commissioner) and the Director of Criminal Justice Services (the Director) shall, in conjunction with the relevant stakeholders, including the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards, the National Alliance on Mental Illness — Virginia, the Department of Medical Assistance Services, the Office of Emergency Medical Services, Mental Health America of Virginia, VOCAL, Inc., the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Virginia Association of Health Plans, the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Virginia Association of Chiefs of Police, the Virginia Sheriffs’ Association, the Virginia Association of Regional Jails, and the University of Virginia Institute of Law, Psychiatry, and Public Policy, develop a model for the use of alternative transportation providers to provide safe and efficient transportation of individuals involved in the emergency custody or involuntary admission process as an alternative to transportation by law enforcement.

“The model shall include criteria for the certification of alternative transportation providers, including the development of a training curriculum required to achieve such certification, and shall identify the appropriate agency responsible for providing such training and such certification. Further, the Commissioner and the Director shall identify any barriers to the use of alternative transportation in the Commonwealth and detail the costs associated with the implementation of such a model, along with the cost savings and benefits associated with the successful implementation of such a model.

“The model shall be completed by October 1, 2017, and reported to the Joint Subcommittee to Study Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the 21st Century, the House Committee for Courts of Justice, and the Senate Committee for Courts of Justice. The report on such model shall also be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports no later than the first day of the 2018 Regular Session of the General Assembly and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

Acts 2017, cc. 137 and 192 provide: “§ 1. The Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Commissioner) shall, in conjunction with the relevant stakeholders, review the availability of forensic discharge planning services at local and regional correctional facilities for persons who have serious mental illnesses who are to be released from such facilities. The Commissioner shall develop a comprehensive plan for the provision of forensic discharge planning services for such persons at local or regional correctional facilities, which shall include the requirement that each facility have access to a discharge planner, and shall detail the cost considerations associated with the implementation of such a plan as well as any cost savings and benefits associated with the successful implementation of such a plan.

“The plan shall be completed by November 1, 2017, and reported to the Chairmen of the Joint Subcommittee to Study Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the 21st Century, the House Committee for Courts of Justice, and the Senate Committee for Courts of Justice. The report on such plan shall also be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports no later than the first day of the 2018 Regular Session of the General Assembly and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

Acts 2017, cc. 418 and 426, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Board of Counseling shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 918 and 919, cl. 1 provides: “That the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall establish a work group to (i) review the current process for conducting evaluations of persons who are subject to emergency custody orders to determine whether they meet the criteria for temporary detention, including any challenges or barriers to timely completion of such evaluations and factors giving rise to delays in completion of such evaluations, and (ii) develop a comprehensive plan to expand the individuals who may conduct effective evaluations of persons who are subject to emergency custody orders to determine whether they meet the criteria for temporary detention. The work group shall consider other states’ experiences in expanding the individuals who may conduct evaluations of persons subject to emergency custody orders. Such comprehensive plan shall include specific recommendations for legislative or budget actions necessary to implement the plan. The work group shall include representatives of the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards, the National Alliance on Mental Illness — Virginia, the Virginia Organization of Consumers Asserting Leadership (VOCAL), the Psychiatric Society of Virginia, the Virginia College of Emergency Physicians, the Medical Society of Virginia, and such other stakeholders as the Commissioner may deem appropriate. The work group shall report its findings and conclusions and the comprehensive plan to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, the Senate Committee on Education and Health, and the Joint Subcommittee to Study Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the 21st Century by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020,
cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020,
cc. 1197 and 1248, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Lottery Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1218 and 1256, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Lottery Board (the Board) shall promulgate regulations implementing the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption. The Board shall complete work on such regulations no later than September 15, 2020.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 584 and 754 are identical, and added subdivision 9.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 473 added subdivision 10.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “consumers” in subdivision 6, “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” in subdivision 7, “individual who has received services” for “person who has been a consumer,” “individual” for “consumer” and “individuals” for “consumers” in subdivision 8, and “at least one individual receiving services” for “at least one consumer” in subdivision 10.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and substituted “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department of Rehabilitative Services” in subsection 9.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 847, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

” for “pursuant to § 51.5-39.12”. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 571, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Commonwealth’s designated protection and advocacy system” for “Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy” in both versions of subdivision 7.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 94 added subdivision 11.

The 2016 amendment by c. 407 added subdivision 11 and was redesignated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission as subdivision 12.

The 2016 amendment by c. 686 added subdivision 11 and was redesignated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission as subdivision 13.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 418 and 426 are identical, and deleted former subdivision 11, which read “To certify individuals as peer providers in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board” and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 455 and 470 are identical, and in subdivision 7, inserted the clause (i) designation and “as that term is defined in §

37.2-709.1

,” “and (ii) serious injuries, as that term is defined in regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to §

37.2-400

, or deaths of individuals receiving services in programs operated or licensed by the Department” and “serious injury.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1197 and 1248 are identical, and substituted “House Committee on Appropriations and Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “House Appropriations and Senate Finances Committees” in subdivision 12; and inserted subdivision 13 before the final paragraph of the section.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1218 and 1256 are identical, and added subdivision 13.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 64 and 65, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision 7, inserted “within 15 working days of such critical incident or death” in clause (i), and rewrote clause (ii), which read “serious injuries, as that term is defined in regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to §

37.2-400

, or deaths of individuals receiving services in programs operated or licensed by the Department within 15 working days of the critical incident, serious injury, or death” and added clause (iii).

§ 37.2-305.
Receiving gifts and endowments.

The Commissioner may receive gifts, bequests, and endowments to or for state facilities in their names or to or for any individual receiving services in state facilities. When gifts, bequests, and endowments are accepted by the Commissioner, he shall well and faithfully administer such trusts.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-37; 1960, c. 134; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-22; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individual receiving services” for “consumer” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 37.2-306.
Research into causes of mental illness, developmental disabilities, substance abuse, and related subjects.

The Commissioner is hereby directed to promote research into the causes of mental illness, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse throughout the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall encourage the directors of the state facilities and their staffs in the investigation of all subjects relating to mental illness, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse. In these research programs, the Commissioner shall make use, insofar as practicable, of the services and facilities of medical schools and the hospitals allied with them.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 37-14, 37-38.1; 1950, p. 900; 1958, c. 610; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-24; 1972, c. 639; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, c. 458.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” twice.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 substituted “developmental disabilities” for “intellectual disability” twice.

§ 37.2-307.
Employment of special counsel to defend Board member, officer, or employee of Department in criminal cases.

If the Commissioner, any Board member, or any officer or employee of the Department is arrested, indicted, or otherwise prosecuted on any charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his official duties, the Commissioner may employ special counsel, to be approved by the Attorney General, to defend the person. The compensation for the special counsel employed pursuant to this section shall, subject to approval of the Attorney General, be paid out of funds appropriated to the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-16.2; 1966, c. 371; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-38; 1976, c. 671; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-308.
Data reporting on children and adolescents.

The Department shall collect and compile the following data:

The total number of licensed and staffed inpatient acute care psychiatric beds for children under the age of 14 and adolescents ages 14 through 17; and

The total number of licensed and staffed residential treatment beds for children under the age of 14 and adolescents ages 14 through 17 in residential facilities licensed pursuant to this title, excluding group homes.

The Department shall collect and compile data obtained from the community policy and management team pursuant to subdivision 16 of §

2.2-5206

and each community services board or behavioral health authority pursuant to §

37.2-507

and subdivision 18 of §

37.2-605

. The Department shall ensure that the data reported is not duplicative.

The Department shall report this data on a quarterly basis to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations and to the Virginia Commission on Youth.

History.

2002, cc. 585, 619, § 37.1-189.3; 2005, c. 716; 2008, c. 277; 2022, c. 264.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees.” March 10, 2021.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 277 substituted “16” for “15” in the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 264, substituted “subdivision 17” for “subdivision 18” in subsection B.

§ 37.2-308.01.
Commitment hearings for involuntary admissions; data sharing.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 16.1-305 and

37.2-818

, at the request of the Department and as provided in this section, the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall provide to the Department electronic data, including individually identifiable information, on the proceedings provided for in Article 16 (§ 16.1-335 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1 and Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.). For the purposes of this section, “individually identifiable information” shall include the name and date of birth of the individual who is the subject of the proceeding and the last four digits of the individual’s social security number.

Electronic data collected by the Department pursuant to this section may be used by the Department for the purposes of developing and maintaining statistical archives, conducting research on the outcome of proceedings provided for in Article 16 (§ 16.1-335 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1 and Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.), and preparing analyses and reports for use by the Department.

The Department shall take all necessary steps to protect the security and privacy of the electronic data to the same extent required by state and federal law and regulations governing health information privacy. Such electronic data shall not be subject to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

History.

2017, cc. 188, 719.

§ 37.2-308.1.
Acute psychiatric bed registry.

The Department shall develop and administer a web-based acute psychiatric bed registry to collect, aggregate, and display information about available acute beds in public and private inpatient psychiatric facilities and public and private residential crisis stabilization units to facilitate the identification and designation of facilities for the temporary detention and treatment of individuals who meet the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

37.2-809

.

The acute psychiatric bed registry created pursuant to subsection A shall:

Include descriptive information for every public and private inpatient psychiatric facility and every public and private residential crisis stabilization unit in the Commonwealth, including contact information for the facility or unit;

Provide real-time information about the number of beds available at each facility or unit and, for each available bed, the type of patient that may be admitted, the level of security provided, and any other information that may be necessary to allow employees or designees of community services boards and employees of inpatient psychiatric facilities or public and private residential crisis stabilization units to identify appropriate facilities for detention and treatment of individuals who meet the criteria for temporary detention; and

Allow employees and designees of community services boards, employees of inpatient psychiatric facilities or public and private residential crisis stabilization units, and health care providers as defined in §

8.01-581.1

working in an emergency room of a hospital or clinic or other facility rendering emergency medical care to perform searches of the registry to identify available beds that are appropriate for the detention and treatment of individuals who meet the criteria for temporary detention.

Every state facility, community services board, behavioral health authority, and private inpatient provider licensed by the Department shall participate in the acute psychiatric bed registry established pursuant to subsection A and shall designate such employees as may be necessary to submit information for inclusion in the acute psychiatric bed registry and serve as a point of contact for addressing requests for information related to data reported to the acute psychiatric bed registry.

Every state facility, community services board, behavioral health authority, and private inpatient provider licensed by the Department shall update information included in the acute psychiatric bed registry whenever there is a change in bed availability for the facility, board, authority, or provider or, if no change in bed availability has occurred, at least daily.

The Commissioner may enter into a contract with a private entity for the development and administration of the acute psychiatric bed registry established pursuant to subsection A.

History.

2014, cc. 691, 774; 2015, cc. 34, 116.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and the provisions of §

37.2-308.1

as created by this act are in force from the passage of this act [April 6, 2014] and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective in due course except as provided in the third enactment.”

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

Acts 2020, cc. 235 and 367, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (the Department) shall establish a work group to include representatives of such stakeholders as the Department may deem appropriate (i) to evaluate the role of the acute psychiatric bed registry (the registry) in collecting and disseminating information about the availability of acute psychiatric beds in the Commonwealth and collecting data and information to ensure adequate oversight of the process by which individuals are referred for acute psychiatric services, the structure of the registry, and the types of data required to be reported to the registry and (ii) to make recommendations for statutory, budgetary, or other actions necessary to redefine the purpose of the registry and improve its structure and effectiveness. The work group shall report its findings, conclusions, and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Joint Subcommittee to Study Mental Health Services in the Commonwealth in the Twenty-First Century by November 1, 2020.”

Effective date.

The provisions of Acts 2014, c. 691 enacting §

37.2-308.1

became effective April 6, 2014, by emergency clause.

Acts 2014, c. 774 became effective April 7, 2014, by emergency clause.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 34 and 116 are identical, added subsection D, and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

§ 37.2-309.
Department responsible for substance abuse services; office established; qualifications of staff.

The Department shall be responsible for the administration, planning, and regulation of substance abuse services in the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall establish an Office of Substance Abuse Services and employ a director and staff who shall have knowledge and experience in the field of substance abuse to carry out this responsibility. Each substance abuse treatment program shall provide data, statistics, schedules, and information that may be reasonably required to the Department.

History.

1976, cc. 739, 767, §§ 37.1-204, 37.1-219; 1980, c. 582; 1998, c. 724; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-310.
Powers and duties of Department related to substance abuse.

The Department shall have the following powers and duties related to substance abuse:

To act as the sole state agency for the planning, coordination, and evaluation of the comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services.

To provide staff assistance to the Substance Abuse Services Council pursuant to §

2.2-2696

.

To (i) develop, implement, and promote, in cooperation with federal, state, local, and other publicly-funded agencies, a comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services, consistent with federal guidelines and regulations, for the long-range development of adequate and coordinated programs, services, and facilities for the research, prevention, and control of substance abuse and the treatment and rehabilitation of persons with substance abuse; (ii) review the plan annually; and (iii) make revisions in the plan that are necessary or desirable.

To develop, in cooperation with the Department of Corrections, Virginia Parole Board, Department of Juvenile Justice, Department of Criminal Justice Services, Commission on the Virginia Alcohol Safety Action Program, Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, Department of Education, Department of Health, Department of Social Services, and other appropriate agencies, a section of the comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services that addresses the need for treatment programs for persons with substance abuse who are involved with these agencies.

To specify uniform methods for keeping statistical information for inclusion in the comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services.

To provide technical assistance and consultation services to state and local agencies in planning, developing, and implementing services for persons with substance abuse.

To review and comment on all applications for state or federal funds or services to be used in substance abuse programs in accordance with §

37.2-311

and on all requests by state agencies for appropriations from the General Assembly for use in substance abuse programs.

To recommend to the Governor and the General Assembly legislation necessary to implement programs, services, and facilities for the prevention and control of substance abuse and the treatment and rehabilitation of persons with substance abuse.

To organize and foster training programs for all persons engaged in the treatment of substance abuse.

To identify, coordinate, mobilize, and use the research and public service resources of institutions of higher education, all levels of government, business, industry, and the community at large in the understanding and solution of problems relating to substance abuse.

To inspect substance abuse treatment programs at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

To maintain a current list of substance abuse treatment programs, which shall be made available upon request.

History.

1976, cc. 739, 767, §§ 37.1-205, 37.1-205.1, 37.1-219; 1977, c. 18; 1980, c. 582; 1988, c. 212, § 37.1-205.1; 1998, c. 724; 2005, c. 716; 2016, c. 686.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 686 deleted subdivision 4, which read “To report biennially to the General Assembly on the comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services and the Department’s activities in administering, planning, and regulating substance abuse services and specifically on the extent to which the Department’s duties as specified in this title have been performed.”; and renumbered remaining subdivisions accordingly.

§ 37.2-311.
Review of applications for state or federal funds or services used in substance abuse programs.

No state agency that is authorized to issue final approval or disapproval of or to make a final review and comment on any application for state funds or services that are to be used in a substance abuse program shall take final action on an application until the application is first reviewed and commented on by the Department to determine its compatibility with the comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services, and thereafter the review and comment by the Department shall remain a part of the application documents.

Every applicant for any state funds, services, loans, grants-in-aid, or matching funds that are to be used in connection with any substance abuse program shall submit a copy of the application for those funds, services, loans, grants-in-aid, or matching funds to the Department for review and comment simultaneously with submission of the application to the funding source.

The Department shall review and comment on each application within 45 days after receiving the application or in accordance with the requirements of the funding source.

Every applicant for any federal funds that are to be used in connection with any substance abuse program shall submit a summary of the application for those funds to the Department for review and comment simultaneously with submission of the application to the funding source. If the application is approved, the applicant shall then provide the Department with a complete copy of the application as funded within 45 days of receiving official notification of funding.

Each state agency requesting an appropriation or a change in an existing appropriation from the General Assembly for substance abuse programs shall submit the request to the Department for review and comment to determine its compatibility with the comprehensive interagency state plan for substance abuse services and shall supply the Department with all relevant information, including a full report on funds expended pursuant to prior appropriations. The Department shall provide the Governor and the General Assembly with its assessment of each request by a state agency for an appropriation or a change in an existing appropriation.

History.

1976, c. 767, § 37.1-206; 1980, c. 582; 1998, c. 724; 2005, c. 716; 2008, c. 83.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 83 substituted “state funds” for “state or federal funds” near the middle of subsection A; substituted “any state funds” for “any federal or state funds” and “grants-in-aid, or matching funds that” for “grants-in-aid, matching funds, or services that” and “grants-in-aid, or matching funds to” for “grants-in-aid, matching funds, or services to” in subsection B; inserted subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.